Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.360

Lease of real property—Term of a lease—Use of proceeds—Retroactive application.

(1) The department of social and health services and other state agencies may lease real property and improvements thereon to a consortium of three or more counties in order for the counties to construct or otherwise acquire correctional facilities for juveniles or adults.

(2) A lease governed by subsection (1) of this section shall not charge more than one dollar per year for the land value and facilities value, during the initial term of the lease, but the lease may include provisions for payment of any reasonable operation and maintenance expenses incurred by the state.

The initial term of a lease governed by subsection (1) of this section shall not exceed twenty years, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. A lease renewed under subsection (1) of this section after the initial term shall charge the fair rental value for the land and improvements other than those improvements paid for by a contracting consortium. The renewed lease may also include provisions for payment of any reasonable operation and maintenance expenses incurred by the state. For the purposes of this subsection, fair rental value shall be determined by the commissioner of public lands in consultation with the department and shall not include the value of any improvements paid for by a contracting consortium.

(3) The net proceeds generated from any lease entered or renewed under subsection (1) of this section involving land and facilities on the grounds of eastern state hospital shall be used solely for the benefit of eastern state hospital programs for the long-term care needs of patients with mental disorders. These proceeds shall not supplant or replace funding from traditional sources for the normal operations and maintenance or capital budget projects. It is the intent of this subsection to ensure that eastern state hospital receives the full benefit intended by this section, and that such effect will not be diminished by budget adjustments inconsistent with this intent.

(4) The initial term of a lease under subsection (1) of this section entered into after January 1, 1996, and involving the grounds of eastern state hospital, shall not exceed fifty years. This subsection applies retroactively, and the department shall modify any existing leases to comply with the terms of this subsection. No other terms of a lease modified by this subsection may be modified unless both parties agree.

[ 1997 c 349 s 1; 1996 c 261 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 349: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1997 c 349 s 2.]

Effective date—1997 c 349: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 13, 1997]." [ 1997 c 349 s 3.]